New Jersey, session 221, A3085.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    R.S.39:3-33 is amended to read as follows: 39:3-33.  The owner of an automobile which is driven on the public highways of this State shall display not less than 12 inches nor more than 48 inches from the ground in a horizontal position, and in such a way as not to swing, [an identification mark or marks] a single license plate to be furnished by the [division; provided, that if two marks are issued they] commission, which shall be displayed on the [front and] rear of the vehicle[; and provided, further, that if only one mark is issued it shall be displayed on the rear of the vehicle; and provided, further, that the rear identification mark]. The license plate may be displayed more than 48 inches from the ground on tank trucks, trailers and other commercial vehicles carrying inflammable liquids and on sanitation vehicles which are used to collect, transport and dispose of garbage, solid wastes and refuse. Motorcycles shall also display [an identification mark or marks; provided, that if two marks are issued they shall be displayed on the front and rear of the motorcycle; and provided, further, that if only one mark is issued it shall be displayed] a single license plate on the rear of the motorcycle. The [identification mark or marks] license plate shall contain the number of the registration certificate of the vehicle and shall be of such design and material as prescribed pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1989, c.202 (C.39:3-33.9). All [identification marks] license plates shall be kept clear and distinct and free from grease, dust or other blurring matter, so as to be plainly visible at all times of the day and night. No person shall drive a motor vehicle which has a license plate frame or identification marker holder that conceals or otherwise obscures any part of any marking imprinted upon the vehicle's [registration] license plate or any part of any insert which the [director] chief administrator, as hereinafter provided, issues to be inserted in and attached to that [registration] license plate [or marker]. The [director] chief administrator is authorized and empowered to issue [registration] license plate inserts, to be inserted in and attached to the [registration] license plates [or markers] described herein.  They may be issued in the place of new [registration] license plates [or markers]; and inscribed thereon, in numerals, shall be the year in which registration of the vehicle has been granted. No person shall drive a motor vehicle the owner of which has not complied with the provisions of this subtitle concerning the proper registration and identification thereof, nor drive a motor vehicle which displays a fictitious number, or a number other than that designated for the motor vehicle in its registration certificate. During the period of time between the application for motor vehicle registration and the receipt of [registration plates] a license plate from the [division] commission, no person shall affix a plate or marker for the purpose of advertisement in the position on a motor vehicle normally reserved for the display of the [registration plates] license plate required by this section if the plate [or marker] is designed with a combination of letters, numbers, colors, or words to resemble the [registration plates] license plate required by this section. A person convicted of displaying a fictitious number, as prohibited herein, shall be subject to a fine not exceeding [$500.00] $500 or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than 60 days. A person violating any other provision of this section shall be subject to a fine not exceeding [$100.00] $100. In default of the payment thereof, there shall be imposed an imprisonment in the county jail for a period not exceeding 10 days.  A person convicted of a second offense of the same violation may be fined in double the amount herein prescribed for the first offense and may, in default of the payment thereof, be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for a period not exceeding 20 days. These penalties shall not apply to the display of a fictitious number. (cf: P.L.1989, c.202, s.1) 2.  (New section)  Any person who was issued two license plates prior to the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) may return one license plate to the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission and display a single license plate on the rear of the vehicle pursuant to R.S.39:3-33. 3.  This act shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month following enactment, but the Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission may take such anticipatory action in advance of that date as may be necessary for the timely implementation of this act.